skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/S__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>k</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SO</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Sam</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SO</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SA</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gBiH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Se</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SoH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SAm</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Si</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SoH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>kRu</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>k</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SO</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>SaH</l><r>S<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="/t__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>k</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RO</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ram</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RO</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RA</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dBiH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Re</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RoH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RAm</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ri</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RoH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RO</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>RaH</l><r>t<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/S__nm"/></e>
    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/t__nm"/></e>
